Massachusetts, session 194th, H2936.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 12 of chapter 32 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts State Retirement Board shall
provide to Mary Coulter-Bennett, the surviving beneficiary of former State Police Detective
Lieutenant William Coulter, a lifetime, monthly allowance equal to the amount she would
receive as if William Coulter had, upon retirement, elected option (c) of subdivision (2) of said
section 12 of said chapter 32 and nominated Mary Coulter-Bennett as his sole surviving eligible
beneficiary. The allowance shall be payable as of the date of William Coulter’s death.
of 2

(b) Any retirement benefit provided to Mary Coulter-Bennett pursuant to this act shall be
in lieu of, and not in addition to, any benefits she may have otherwise received from the
Massachusetts State Employees Retirement System as William Coulter’s beneficiary.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect as of September 30, 2019.
of 2